Utah statutes.
57-16-8.   Payment of rent and fees during pendency of eviction proceeding.

If a resident elects to contest an eviction proceeding, all rents, fees, and service charges due and incurred during the pendency of the action shall be paid into court according to the current mobile home park payment schedule. Failure of the resident to pay such amounts may, in the discretion of the court, constitute grounds for granting summary judgment in favor of the mobile home park.  Upon final termination of the issues between the parties, the court shall order all amounts paid into court paid to the mobile home park. The prevailing party is also entitled to court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.



Enacted by Chapter 178, 1981 General Session

